Mississippi statutes. Title 53. Oil, Gas, and Other Minerals
Underground Storage of Natural Gas or Compressed Air

§ 53-3-151.
Definitions.

As used in Sections 53-3-151 through 53-3-165: (a) “underground storage” shall mean storage in an underground reservoir, stratum or formation of the earth; (b) “natural gas” shall mean gas of sufficient purity to be capable of use for residential purposes; (c) “native gas” shall mean gas which previously has not been withdrawn from the earth, or which, having been withdrawn, is injected into a reservoir for purposes other than underground storage; (d) “compressed air” shall mean any nonhydrocarbon gas; and (e) “State Oil and Gas Board” or “board” shall mean the State Oil and Gas Board of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-131; Laws, 1971, ch. 436, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1971); Laws, 1992, ch. 344 § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 20, 1992).

§ 53-3-153.
Legislative declaration.

The underground storage of natural gas or compressed air which promotes the conservation thereof, which permits the building of large quantities of natural gas or compressed air in reserve for orderly withdrawal in periods of peak demand, making natural gas or compressed air more readily available to the consumer, or which provides more uniform withdrawal from various gas or oil fields, is in the public interest and welfare of this state and is for a public purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-132; Laws, 1971, ch. 436, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 344 § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 20, 1992).

§ 53-3-155.
Underground storage authorized pursuant to board’s order.

The use of an underground reservoir, stratum or formation as a reservoir for the storage of natural gas or compressed air as an appliance or appurtenance in connection with the conveying, transmission or distribution of natural gas or compressed air is hereby authorized, provided that the State Oil and Gas Board shall first enter an order, after notice and hearing pursuant to the provisions of Sections 53-1-19 through 53-1-31, inclusive, approving any such proposed underground storage of natural gas or compressed air upon finding as follows:

That the underground stratum or formation sought to be used as a reservoir for the injection, storage and withdrawal of natural gas or compressed air is suitable and feasible for such use and in the public interest, and is not an oil reservoir capable of commercial production;

That a majority interest of all rights of the surface interest and a majority interest of all interests in the underground stratum or formation have consented to such use in writing;

That the use of the underground stratum as a reservoir for the storage of natural gas or compressed air will not contaminate other formations containing fresh water, oil, gas or other commercial mineral deposits; and

That the proposed storage will not endanger lives or property.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-133; Laws, 1971, ch. 436, § 3; Laws, 1992, ch. 344 § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 20, 1992).

§ 53-3-157.
Protection against pollution or against escape of natural gas or compressed air; property rights.

The State Oil and Gas Board shall issue such orders, rules and regulations as may be necessary for the purpose of protecting any such underground storage reservoir, stratum or formation against pollution or against the escape of natural gas or compressed air therefrom, including such necessary rules and regulations as may pertain to the drilling into or through such underground storage reservoir, stratum or formation.

All natural gas or compressed air which has previously been reduced to possession and which is subsequently injected into an underground storage reservoir, stratum or formation shall at all times be deemed the property of the injector, his successors and assigns, and in no event shall such natural gas or compressed air be subject to the right of the owner of the surface of the lands or of any mineral interest therein under which such underground storage reservoir, stratum or formation shall lie or be adjacent to or of any person other than the injector, his successors and assigns, to produce, take, reduce to possession, waste or otherwise interfere with or exercise any control thereover; provided, that the State Oil and Gas Board shall have entered an order, either before or after the enactment hereof, approving such underground storage reservoir, stratum or formation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-134; Laws, 1971, ch. 436, § 4; Laws, 1992, ch. 344 § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 20, 1992).

§ 53-3-159.
Right of eminent domain.

Any company, person or association of persons, municipality, association of municipalities, public utility district, or natural gas district, incorporated or organized for the purpose of building or constructing pipelines and appliances for the conveying and distribution of oil or gas and authorized by law in Section 11-27-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, to exercise eminent domain rights with respect thereto, is hereby empowered, after obtaining approval of the State Oil and Gas Board as herein required, to exercise the right of eminent domain, in the manner provided by law, to acquire all surface and subsurface rights necessary and useful for the purpose of storing natural gas or compressed air in any underground reservoir, stratum or formation, pursuant to the provisions hereof. Such power shall be exercised under the procedure provided by Chapter 27, Title 11, Mississippi Code of 1972, provided that:

No gas-bearing sand, stratum or formation shall be subject to appropriation by eminent domain unless the condemnor shall show, to the satisfaction of the board, that such sand, stratum or formation has a greater value or utility as a natural gas or compressed air storage reservoir for the purpose of ensuring an adequate supply of natural gas or compressed air for consumers, or for the conservation of natural gas or compressed air, than for the production of the native gas which remains therein;

Adequate and fair compensation for any native gas which is appropriated by eminent domain and which is otherwise capable of being commercially produced shall be included in that hereinabove provided for; and

No rights or interests in underground reservoirs, strata or formations acquired for the injection, storage and withdrawal of natural gas or compressed air by a party who has eminent domain rights under Section 11-27-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, and who has obtained an order from the Oil and Gas Board under the provisions of Section 53-3-155, shall be subject to appropriation hereunder.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-135; Laws, 1971, ch. 436, § 5; Laws, 1992, ch. 344 § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 20, 1992).

§ 53-3-161.
Right of landowner to drill and make other use of land.

The right of condemnation granted by Section 53-3-159, shall be without prejudice to the right of the owner of said land or of other rights or interests therein to drill or bore through the underground reservoir, stratum or formation so appropriated in such manner as shall comply with orders, rules and regulations of the State Oil and Gas Board issued for the purpose of protecting underground storage reservoirs, strata or formations against pollution and against the escape of natural gas or compressed air therefrom, and shall be without prejudice to the rights of the owners of said lands or other rights or interests therein as to all other uses thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-137; Laws, 1971, ch. 436, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1971); Laws, 1992, ch. 344 § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 20, 1992).

§ 53-3-163.
Action for provable damages.

If any property owner whose interest has been acquired under the provisions of Sections 53-3-151 through 53-3-165, either through negotiation or through eminent domain proceedings, shall file a legal action for provable damages as a result of alleged negligent use of the property acquired by the condemnor, the proof of said damages shall constitute a prima facie case of negligence on the part of the condemnor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-138; Laws, 1971, ch. 436, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1971).

§ 53-3-165.
Storage in offshore waters prohibited.

No provisions of Sections 53-3-151 through 53-3-165 shall operate so as to authorize the establishment of underground storage of natural gas or compressed air in the offshore waters of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-136; Laws, 1971, ch. 436, § 6; Laws, 1992, ch. 344 § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 20, 1992).